Vermont statutes. Constitution of the State of Vermont
Chapter I A Declaration of the Rights of the Inhabitants of the State of Vermont

Article 1. [All persons born free; their natural rights; slavery prohibited]

That all persons are born equally free and independent, and have certain natural, inherent, and unalienable rights, amongst which are the enjoying and defending life and liberty, acquiring, possessing and protecting property, and pursuing and obtaining happiness and safety; therefore no person born in this country, or brought from over sea, ought to be holden by law, to serve any person as a servant, slave or apprentice, after arriving to the age of twenty-one years, unless bound by the person’s own consent, after arriving to such age, or bound by law for the payment of debts, damages, fines, costs, or the like.

Article 2. [Private property subject to public use; owner to be paid]

That private property ought to be subservient to public uses when necessity requires it, nevertheless, whenever any person’s property is taken for the use of the public, the owner ought to receive an equivalent in money.

Article 3. [Freedom in religion; right and duty of religious worship]

That all persons have a natural and unalienable right, to worship Almighty God, according to the dictates of their own consciences and understandings, as in their opinion shall be regulated by the word of God; and that no person ought to, or of right can be compelled to attend any religious worship, or erect or support any place of worship, or maintain any minister, contrary to the dictates of conscience, nor can any person be justly deprived or abridged of any civil right as a citizen, on account of religious sentiments, or peculia[r] mode of religious worship; and that no authority can, or ought to be vested in, or assumed by, any power whatever, that shall in any case interfere with, or in any manner control the rights of conscience, in the free exercise of religious worship. Nevertheless, every sect or denomination of christians ought to observe the sabbath or Lord’s day, and keep up some sort of religious worship, which to them shall seem most agreeable to the revealed will of God.

Article 4. [Remedy at law secured to all]

Every person within this state ought to find a certain remedy, by having recourse to the laws, for all injuries or wrongs which one may receive in person, property or character; every person ought to obtain right and justice, freely, and without being obliged to purchase it; completely and without any denial; promptly and without delay; comformably to the laws.

Article 5. [Internal police]

That the people of this state by their legal representatives, have the sole, inherent, and exclusive right of governing and regulating the internal police of the same.

Article 6. [Officers servants of the people]

That all power being originally inherent in and co[n]sequently derived from the people, therefore, all officers of government, whether legislative or executive, are their trustees and servants; and at all times, in a legal way, accountable to them.

Article 7. [Government for the people; they may change it]

That government is, or ought to be, instituted for the common benefit, protection, and security of the people, nation, or community, and not for the particular emolument or advantage of any single person, family, or set of persons, who are a part only of that community; and that the community hath an indubitable, unalienable, and indefeasible right, to reform or alter government, in such manner as shall be, by that community, judged most conducive to the public weal.

Article 8. [Elections to be free and pure; rights of voters therein]

That all elections ought to be free and without corruption, and that all voters, having a sufficient, evident, common interest with, and attachment to the community, have a right to elect officers, and be elected into office, agreeably to the regulations made in this constitution.

Article 9. [Citizens’ rights and duties in the State; bearing arms; taxation]

That every member of society hath a right to be protected in the enjoyment of life, liberty, and property, and therefore is bound to contribute the member’s proportion towards the expence of that protection, and yield personal service, when necessary, or an equivalent thereto, but no part of any person’s property can be justly taken, or applied to public uses, without the person’s own consent, or that of the Representative Body, nor can any person who is conscientiously scrupulous of bearing arms, be justly compelled thereto, if such person will pay such equivalent; nor are the people bound by any law but such as they have in like manner assented to, for their common good: and previous to any law being made to raise a tax, the purpose for which it is to be raised ought to appear evident to the Legislature to be of more service to community than the money would be if not collected.

Article 10. [Rights of persons accused of crime; personal liberty; waiver of jury trial]

That in all prosecutions for criminal offenses, a person hath a right to be heard by oneself and by counsel; to demand the cause and nature of the accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses; to call for evidence in the person’s favor, and a speedy public trial by an impartial jury of the country; without the unanimous consent of which jury, the person cannot be found guilty; nor can a person be compelled to give evidence against oneself; nor can any person be justly deprived of liberty, except by the laws of the land, or the judgment of the person’s peers; provided, nevertheless, in criminal prosecutions for offenses not punishable by death, the accused, with the consent of the prosecuting officer entered of record, may in open court or by a writing signed by the accused and filed with the court, waive the right to a jury trial and submit the issue of the accused’s guilt to the determination and judgment of the court without a jury.

Particularity.

There had been no claim of surprise or prejudice where the information charging leaving the scene of an accident did not contain the word “immediately,” nor could there be. The information and accompanying affidavit clearly explained the charged conduct and related it directly to the statute in question; defendant’s ability to prepare his defense was in no way influenced. State v. Neisner, 2010 VT 112, 189 Vt. 160, 16 A.3d 597, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 117 (2010).

Information charging leaving the scene of an accident was not insufficient under the Vermont Constitution because it did not contain the word “immediately.” The plain meaning of the phrase “following the crash” and the allegation that there had been a serious injury to which defendant “did not render any assistance reasonably necessary” made clear that the State was not charging defendant with violating the statute by later driving past the scene after he had originally fled or when a trooper questioned him at his home. State v. Neisner, 2010 VT 112, 189 Vt. 160, 16 A.3d 597, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 117 (2010).

Where plaintiff’s complaint alleged only that defendants denied her “procedural and substantive due process and liberty in violation of the . . . Vermont constitution[],” her allegation did not fairly apprise defendants that her claim arose under Article 4 because it could also be construed to refer to this article; thus, it could not be said that the grounds upon which plaintiff’s State constitutional claims rested were readily discernible from the face of the complaint, and the trial court did not err by dismissing the claims for lack of specificity. Mellin v. Flood Brook Union School District, 173 Vt. 202, 790 A.2d 408, 2001 Vt. LEXIS 407 (2001).

Information charging parents with violation of truancy statute was not defective for failure to allege all essential elements of the crime; affidavit accompanying the information negated all statutory exceptions to the offense of truancy and parents had sufficient notice of the charges to form a defense. State v. DeLaBruere, 154 Vt. 237, 577 A.2d 254, 1990 Vt. LEXIS 74 (1990).

Information must set forth charges with sufficient particularity to allow defendant to make intelligent preparation of defense. State v. Roy, 151 Vt. 17, 557 A.2d 884, 1989 Vt. LEXIS 20 (1989).

An information must set forth charges with such particularity as will reasonably indicate the exact offense the accused is charged with, and will enable her to make intelligent preparation for her defense; to satisfy the requirement, an essential fact, affecting the degree of punishment, must be alleged in the information. State v. Bradley, 145 Vt. 492, 494 A.2d 129, 1985 Vt. LEXIS 319 (1985).

An information is sufficient if it sets forth charges with such particularity as will reasonably indicate the exact offense the accused is charged with, and will enable her to make intelligent preparation for her defense, and this is not a subjective inquiry as to what the accused actually understood, but rather a scrutiny of the charge, as made, to determine what offense is reasonably indicated by its language. State v. Phillips, 142 Vt. 283, 455 A.2d 325, 1982 Vt. LEXIS 636 (1982).

The complaint or other form of accusation of a criminal offense must set forth charges with such particularity as will reasonably indicate the exact offense the accused is charged with, and will enable him to make intelligent preparation for his defense. State v. Christman, 135 Vt. 59, 370 A.2d 624, 1977 Vt. LEXIS 554 (1977).

The prosecutor must frame his charge in the pleading in such a manner as to meet two general requirements: to properly give notice of the offense charged and to permit a plea in bar to a subsequent prosecution for one of the several offenses after either acquittal or conviction. State v. McDermott, 135 Vt. 47, 373 A.2d 510, 1977 Vt. LEXIS 551 (1977).

This article requires that the charge in a criminal complaint be set forth with such particularity as will reasonably indicate the exact offense charged. State v. Hastings, 133 Vt. 118, 330 A.2d 87, 1974 Vt. LEXIS 298 (1974).

An indictment or information must set forth the offense charged with certainty and particularity. State v. Chapman, 126 Vt. 167, 224 A.2d 925, 1966 Vt. LEXIS 188 (1966).

The averments in a criminal complaint must be such as to inform the accused of the exact nature of the charge brought against him. State v. Chapman, 126 Vt. 167, 224 A.2d 925, 1966 Vt. LEXIS 188 (1966).

Information stating several specific criminal offenses involving operation of motor vehicles with an “x” in box before offense of operating vehicle in excess of legal posted speed limit lacked certainty and particularity required by this article and was fatally defective in failing to inform defendant convicted of operating vehicle in excess of legal posted speed limit of exact charge against. State v. Chapman, 126 Vt. 167, 224 A.2d 925, 1966 Vt. LEXIS 188 (1966).

A defendant is entitled to have an information reasonably indicate the exact offense so as to enable him to make intelligent preparation for his defense. State v. Woodmansee, 124 Vt. 387, 205 A.2d 407, 1964 Vt. LEXIS 119 (1964).

A complaint or information that may apply to one of several definite offenses, without specifying which, is defective under this article. State v. Villa, 92 Vt. 121, 102 A. 935, 1918 Vt. LEXIS 151 (1918); State v. Van Ness, 109 Vt. 392, 199 A. 759, 1938 Vt. LEXIS 146 (1938); State v. Persons, 114 Vt. 435, 46 A.2d 854, 1946 Vt. LEXIS 91 (1946); State v. Chapman, 126 Vt. 167, 224 A.2d 925, 1966 Vt. LEXIS 188 (1966).

A form of accusation of a criminal offense is required by this article to set forth charges with such particularity as will reasonably indicate the exact offense accused is charged with, and will enable him to make intelligent preparation for his defense, and if the trial goes against him, to plead his conviction in a subsequent prosecution for the same offense. State v. Webber, 78 Vt. 463, 62 A. 1018, 1906 Vt. LEXIS 175 (1906); State v. Villa, 92 Vt. 121, 102 A. 935, 1918 Vt. LEXIS 151 (1918); State v. Van Ness, 109 Vt. 392, 199 A. 759, 1938 Vt. LEXIS 146 (1938); State v. Gosselin, 110 Vt. 361, 6 A.2d 14, 1939 Vt. LEXIS 152 (1939); State v. Persons, 114 Vt. 435, 46 A.2d 854, 1946 Vt. LEXIS 91 (1946); State v. Margie, 119 Vt. 137, 120 A.2d 807, 1956 Vt. LEXIS 92 (1956); State v. Parker, 123 Vt. 369, 189 A.2d 540, 1963 Vt. LEXIS 103 (1963); State v. Ciocca, 125 Vt. 64, 209 A.2d 507, 1965 Vt. LEXIS 199 (1965); State v. Woodmansee, 128 Vt. 467, 266 A.2d 448, 1970 Vt. LEXIS 257 (1970); State v. McGrail, 134 Vt. 91, 353 A.2d 342, 1976 Vt. LEXIS 602 (1976); State v. Holden, 136 Vt. 158, 385 A.2d 1092, 1978 Vt. LEXIS 708 (1978).

Particular cases.

Petitioner, who had filed a disciplinary complainant against a psychologist, had no due process right under the Vermont Constitution to obtain from the Office of Professional Regulation records filed by the psychologist at the investigation stage of the proceedings, given the limited interest at issue, the procedural protections complainants already enjoyed in the disciplinary proceedings, and the availability of alternative proceedings to redress complainants’ grievances against psychologists. Wool v. Office of Prof'l Regulation, 2020 VT 44, 212 Vt. 305, 236 A.3d 1250, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2020).

Trial court’s decision to grant postconviction counsel’s motion to withdraw was neither arbitrary nor uninformed, and was fully consistent with any minimal due process protections against arbitrary action that might apply in this context. After being ordered to take a second look at his proposed withdrawal, counsel spoke with petitioner, reread pertinent portions of the record, reconsidered petitioner’s principal contention, and reviewed the case on which petitioner relied. In re Kimmick, 2013 VT 43, 194 Vt. 53, 72 A.3d 337, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 40 (2013).

Article 11. [Search and seizure regulated]

That the people have a right to hold themselves, their houses, papers, and possessions, free from search or seizure; and therefore warrants, without oath or affirmation first made, affording sufficient foundation for them, and whereby by any officer or messenger may be commanded or required to search suspected places, or to seize any person or persons, his, her or their property, not particularly described, are contrary to that right, and ought not to be granted.

Article 12. [Trial by jury to be held sacred]

That when any issue in fact, proper for the cognizance of a jury is joined in a court of law, the parties have a right to trial by jury, which ought to be held sacred.

Article 13. [Freedom of speech and of the press]

That the people have a right to freedom of speech, and of writing and publishing their sentiments, concerning the transactions of government, and therefore the freedom of the press ought not to be restrained.

Article 14. [Immunity for words spoken in legislative debate]

The freedom of deliberation, speech, and debate, in the Legislature, is so essential to the rights of the people, that it cannot be the foundation of any accusation or prosecution, action or complaint, in any other court or place whatsoever.

Article 15. [Legislature only may suspend laws]

The power of suspending laws, or the execution of laws, ought never to be exercised but by the Legislature, or by authority derived from it, to be exercised in such particular cases, as this constitution, or the Legislature shall provide for.

Article 16. [Right to bear arms; standing armies; military power subordinate to civil]

That the people have a right to bear arms for the defence of themselves and the State—and as standing armies in time of peace are dangerous to liberty, they ought not to be kept up; and that the military should be kept under strict subordination to and governed by the civil power.

Article 17. [Martial law restricted]

That no person in this state can in any case be subjected to law martial, or to any penalties or pains by virtue of that law except those employed in the army, and the militia in actual service.

Article 18. [Regard to fundamental principles and virtues necessary to preserve liberty]

That frequent recurrence to fundamental principles, and a firm adherence to justice, moderation, temperance, industry, and frugality, are absolutely necessary to preserve the blessings of liberty, and keep government free; the people ought, therefore to pay particular attention to these points, in the choice of officers and representatives, and have a right, in a legal way, to exact a due and constant regard to them, from their legislators and magistrates, in making and executing such laws as are necessary for the good government of the State.

Article 19. [Right to emigrate]

That all people have a natural and inherent right to emigrate from one state to another that will receive them.

Article 20. [Right to assemble, instruct and petition]

That the people have a right to assemble together to consult for their common good—to instruct their Representatives—and to apply to the Legislature for redress of grievances, by address, petition or remonstrance.

Article 21. [No transportation for trial]

That no person shall be liable to be transported out of this state for trial for any offence committed within the same.